South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3371.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-21-2420 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (18) on admissions charged by business leagues or chambers of commerce qualified under 501(c)(6) by the Internal Revenue Service, which are not organized for profit, and no part of whose earnings inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----